California, session 20252026, SB664.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13009 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:13009. (a) By January 1, 2027, the Department of Motor Vehicles, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall develop a Blue Envelope Program to promote inclusivity and enhanced communication between law enforcement and community members with a condition or disability where additional accommodations or awareness may be helpful. The blue envelope developed in the program shall contain the following:(1) Printed information for the envelope’s holder regarding traffic stop safety tips.(2) Printed recommendations to the responding law enforcement officer with interaction techniques to help promote enhanced communication and accommodation between law enforcement and community members.(3) Blank area where the individual, or their emergency contact, may add additional noteworthy comments pertaining to the individual’s needs or requested accommodations.(4) Blank area where the individual may write down the contact information of their emergency contact person.(b) Upon request by a person who is protected by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336), a person who has a condition and may need additional accommodations with law enforcement, or a parent or other family member, legal guardian, conservator, or driver of a passenger with a disability, the department shall provide the requester a blue envelope. The blue envelope shall be designed to hold a copy of the person’s operator license, vehicle registration, and insurance card.(c) This section does not prevent a law enforcement agency from developing its own blue envelope or other products, including, but not limited to, lanyards, seatbelt covers, decals, stickers, wristbands, and keychains, so long as it follows the minimum requirements set forth in this section.(d) Although law enforcement has a duty to extend reasonable accommodations or modifications in accordance with state and federal disability rights laws, this section does not require a peace officer to compromise their safety or the safety of others when encountering a person who has presented a blue envelope or associated products as described in subdivision (c).